Virginia statutes. Title 55.1. Property and Conveyances.
Article 1. Creation and Transfer of Estates.

§ 55.1-100.
Aliens may acquire, hold, and transmit real estate; when reciprocity required.

Any alien, not an enemy, may acquire by purchase or descent and hold real estate in the Commonwealth, and such real estate shall be transmitted in the same manner as real estate held by citizens. However, if, at the time of the transfer, a court of the Commonwealth determines that the laws of a foreign country or sovereignty effectively deny a Virginia resident, legatee, or distributee the benefit, use, or control of money or other property held in such foreign country or sovereignty, a judgment or order issued in the Commonwealth concerning the rights of a resident of that foreign country or sovereignty to the benefit, use, or control of money or property held in the Commonwealth may direct that the money or property be paid into the court for the benefit of the alien. The money or property paid into court shall be paid out only upon order of the court or pursuant to the order or judgment of a court of competent jurisdiction. Any of the money or property remaining with the court upon expiration of three years from the decedent’s death shall be paid out by the court as if the alien had predeceased the decedent.

History.

Code 1919, § 66; Code 1950, §

55-1

; 1993, c. 535; 2019, c. 712.

Transition provisions.

Acts 2019, c. 712, recodified Title 55 as Title 55.1, effective October 1, 2019.
Where appropriate, the historical citations and annotations to former sections have been added to corresponding new sections. For Tables of Comparable sections, see Volume 10.

Acts 2019, c. 712, cl. 2 provides: “That whenever any of the conditions, requirements, provisions, or contents of any section or chapter of Title 55 or any other title of the Code of Virginia as such titles existed prior to October 1, 2019, are transferred in the same or modified form to a new section or chapter of Title 55.1 or any other title of the Code of Virginia and whenever any such former section or chapter is given a new number in Title 55.1 or any other title, all references to any such former section or chapter of Title 55.1 or other title appearing in this Code shall be construed to apply to the new or renumbered section or chapter containing such conditions, requirements, provisions, contents, or portions thereof.”

Acts 2019, c. 712, cl. 3 provides: “That the regulations of any department or agency affected by the revision of Title 55 or such other titles in effect on the effective date of this act shall continue in effect to the extent that they are not in conflict with this act and shall be deemed to be regulations adopted under this act.”

Acts 2019, c. 712, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of § 30-152 of the Code of Virginia shall apply to the revision of Title 55.1 so as to give effect to other laws enacted by the 2019 Session of the General Assembly, notwithstanding the delay in the effective date of this act.”

Acts 2019, c. 712, cl. 5 provides: “That the repeal of Title 55 and §

18.2-324.1

, effective as of October 1, 2019, shall not affect any act or offense done or committed, or any penalty incurred, or any right established, accrued, or accruing on or before such date, or any proceeding, prosecution, suit, or action pending on that day. Except as otherwise provided in this act, neither the repeal of Title 55 nor the enactment of Title 55.1 shall apply to offenses committed prior to October 1, 2019, and prosecution for such offenses shall be governed by the prior law, which is continued in effect for that purpose. For the purposes of this enactment, an offense was committed prior to October 1, 2019, if any of the essential elements of the offense occurred prior thereto.”

Acts 2019, c. 712, cl. 6 provides: “That any notice given, recognizance taken, or process or writ issued before October 1, 2019, shall be valid although given, taken, or to be returned to a day after such date, in like manner as if Title 55.1 had been effective before the same was given, taken, or issued.”

Acts 2019, c. 712, cl. 7 provides: “That if any clause, sentence, paragraph, subdivision, or section of Title 55.1 shall be adjudged in any court of competent jurisdiction to be invalid, the judgment shall not affect, impair, or invalidate the remainder thereof but shall be confined in its operation to the clause, sentence, paragraph, subdivision, or section thereof directly involved in the controversy in which the judgment shall have been rendered, and to this end the provisions of Title 55.1 are declared severable.”

Acts 2019, c. 712, cl. 8 provides: “That the repeal of Title 55, effective as of October 1, 2019, shall not affect the validity, enforceability, or legality of any loan agreement or other contract, or any right established or accrued under such loan agreement or other contract, that existed prior to such repeal.”

Acts 2019, c. 712, cl. 9 provides: “That the repeal of Title 55, effective October 1, 2019, shall not affect the validity, enforceability, or legality of any properly recorded deed that was recorded prior to such repeal.”

Acts 2019, c. 712, cl. 10 provides: “That the repeal of Title 55, effective as of October 1, 2019, shall not affect the validity, enforceability, or legality of any bond or other debt obligation authorized, issued, or outstanding prior to such repeal.”

Acts 2019, c. 712, cl. 11 provides: “That §

18.2-324.1

and Title 55 (§§

55-1

through 55-559) of the Code of Virginia are repealed.”

Acts 2019, c. 712, cl. 12 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall not affect the existing terms of persons currently serving as members of any agency, board, authority, commission, or other entity and that appointees currently holding positions shall maintain their terms of appointment and continue to serve until such time as the existing terms might expire or become renewed. However, any new appointments made on or after October 1, 2019, shall be made in accordance with the provisions of this act.”

Acts 2019, c. 712, cl. 13 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2019.”

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

Law Review.

For article, “Toward a Model Law of Estates and Future Interests,” see 66 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 3 (2009).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

1B M.J. Aliens, § 9; 13A M.J. Mortgages and Deeds of Trust, §§ 2, 104.

§ 55.1-101.
When deed or will necessary to convey estate; no parol partition or gift valid.

No estate of inheritance or freehold in lands shall be conveyed unless by deed or will, and no voluntary partition of lands by coparceners, having such an estate in such land, shall be made except by deed. In addition, no right to a conveyance of any such estate or term in land shall accrue to the donee of the land or those claiming under him, under a gift or promise of gift of such estate or term in land not in writing, even if such gift or promise is followed by possession and improvement of the land by the donee or those claiming under him.

Any lease agreement or other written document conveying a non-freehold estate in land, which was entered into before, and which remains in effect as of, February 13, 2019, or which is entered into after February 13, 2019, shall not be invalid, unenforceable, or subject to repudiation by the parties to such agreement on account of, or otherwise affected by, the fact that the conveyance of the estate was not in the form of a deed.

History.

Code 1919, § 5141; Code 1950, § 55-2; 2019, cc. 11, 49, 712.

Cross references.

For statutes pertaining to partition, see §

8.01-81

et seq.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2019, cc. 11 and 49 amended § 55-2 from which this section is derived. Pursuant to § 30-152, the 2019 amendments have been given effect in this section by designating the existing text as subsection A and deleting “or for a term of more than five years” in the first sentence thereof and adding subsection B.

Amendments by Acts 2019,
cc. 11 and 49, were in response to
Game Place, L.L.C. v. Fredericksburg 35, LLC
,

295 Va. 396

, 813 S.E.2d 312 (2018). See the case notes below.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendments by c. 11, effective February 13, 2019, and c. 49, effective February 19, 2019, are identical, and designated the existing text as subsection A, in subsection A, deleted “or for a term of more than five years” following “inheritance or freehold”; and added subsection B.

Law Review.

For note on promised gifts of land, see 43 Va. L. Rev. 134 (1957).

For article on the care of the aged and the Virginia Statute of Frauds, see 19 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 23 (1962).

For article, “The Virginia Land Trust — An Overlooked Title Holding Device for Investment, Business and Estate Planning Purposes,” see 30 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 73 (1973).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

9A M.J. Gifts, §§ 20, 21; 11B M.J. Landlord and Tenant, § 8.

§ 55.1-102.
When gift of personal property invalid.

No gift of any personal property is valid (i) unless conveyed by deed or will or (ii) unless the donee or a person claiming under the donee has and remains in actual possession of such personal property. If the donor and donee reside together at the time of the gift, possession at the place of their residence is not a sufficient possession within the meaning of this section. This section shall not apply to personal paraphernalia used exclusively by the donee.

History.

Code 1919, § 5142; Code 1950, § 55-3; 1973, c. 401; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-103.
Suicide or attainder of felony.

Neither suicide nor attainder of felony shall cause a corruption of blood or forfeiture of estate.

History.

Code 1919, § 4762; Code 1950, § 55-4; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-104.
Estates to lie in grant as well as in livery.

All real estate shall, as regards the conveyance of the immediate freehold thereof, be deemed to lie in grant as well as in livery.

History.

Code 1919, § 5146; Code 1950, § 55-5; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

5A M.J. Cotenancy, §§ 4, 30 .

§ 55.1-105.
Same estates may be created by deed as by will.

Any interest in or claim to real estate, including easements in gross, may be transferred by deed or will. Any estate may be made to commence at a future date, by deed, in like manner as by will, and any estate that would be valid as an executory devise or bequest is valid if created by deed.

History.

Code 1919, § 5147; Code 1950, § 55-6; 1962, c. 169; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

5A M.J. Cotenancy, § 4.

§ 55.1-106.
Power of disposal in life tenant not to defeat remainder unless exercised; power of disposal held by fiduciary.

If any interest in or claim to real estate or personal property is disposed of by deed or will for life, with a limitation in remainder over, and the same instrument confers expressly or by implication a power upon the life tenant in his lifetime or by will to dispose absolutely of such property, the limitation in remainder over shall not fail, or be defeated, except to the extent that the life tenant lawfully exercised such power of disposal. A deed of trust or mortgage executed by the life tenant shall not be construed to be an absolute disposition of the estate, unless such estate is sold under the deed of trust or mortgage. A power of disposal held by any person in a fiduciary capacity under an express trust in writing shall not be deemed to be held by such fiduciary in a beneficial capacity and shall not be construed in any manner to enlarge the beneficial interest otherwise given to him under such trust.

History.

Code 1919, § 5147; Code 1950, § 55-7; 1978, c. 659; 2005, c. 935; 2019, c. 712.

Editor’s note.

Clause 2 of the 1978 amendatory act provides that “the provisions of this act shall not be construed to restrict the powers possessed by Virginia courts of equity to supervise the fiduciary in the conduct of his duties, to instruct such fiduciary in response to a suit for guidance or for construction of instruments, or to provide appropriate remedies for those affected by any breach of fiduciary duty.”

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

Law Review.

For discussion of powers of appointment in Virginia, see 47 Va. L. Rev. 711 (1961).

§ 55.1-107.
Default or surrender of tenant for life not to prejudice remainderman.

If any tenant for life of land make default or surrender, the heirs or those entitled to the remainder may, before judgment, be admitted to defend their right or, after judgment, may assert their right without prejudice from such default or surrender.

History.

Code 1919, § 5443; Code 1950, § 55-8; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-108.
Conveyance of estate or interest in property by grantor to himself and another.

Any person having an estate or interest in real or personal property may convey such estate or interest to himself or to himself and another or others, including to himself and his spouse as tenants by the entirety or otherwise, and the fact that one or more persons are both grantor or grantee or grantors and grantees in the same conveyance shall be no objection to the conveyance. The grantee or grantees in any such conveyance shall take title in like manner, and the estate vested in them shall be the same as if the conveyance had been made by one or more persons who are not also grantee or grantees.

All such conveyances made prior to July 1, 1986, are validated notwithstanding defects in the form thereof that do not affect vested rights.

History.

1945, p. 39; Michie Suppl. 1946, § 5147a; Code 1950, § 55-9; 1986, c. 583; 1987, c. 186; 1999, c. 196; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-109.
Deed valid for grantor’s right; operation of warranty.

A writing that purports to pass or assure a greater right or interest in real estate than the person making it may lawfully pass or assure shall operate as an alienation of such right or interest in such real estate as such person might lawfully convey or assure; and when the deed of the alienor mentions that he and his heirs will warrant what it purports to pass or assure, if anything descends from him, his heirs shall be barred for the value of what is so descended or liable for such value.

History.

Code 1919, § 5148; Code 1950, § 55-10; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

5A M.J. Covenants, § 24.

§ 55.1-110.
Conveyance, devise, or grant without words of limitation.

When any real estate is conveyed, devised, or granted to any person without any words of limitation, such conveyance, devise, or grant shall be construed to pass the fee simple or other whole estate or interest that the testator or grantor has power to dispose of in such real estate, unless a contrary intention is apparent in the conveyance, devise, or grant.

History.

Code 1919, § 5149; Code 1950, § 55-11; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

Law Review.

For discussion of construction of instruments, see 45 Va. L. Rev. 1459 (1959).

§ 55.1-111.
Fee tail converted into fee simple.

Every estate in lands so limited that, as the law was on October 7, 1776, such estate would have been an estate tail shall be deemed an estate in fee simple, and every limitation upon such an estate shall be held valid if the same would be valid when limited upon an estate in fee simple created by technical language.

History.

Code 1919, § 5150; Code 1950, § 55-12; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

14B M.J. Perpetuities and Restraints on Alienation, § 4.

§ 55.1-112.
Estate of freehold to one with remainder to heirs, etc.; rule in Shelley’s Case abolished.

Wherever any person by deed, will, or other writing takes an estate of freehold in land, or takes such an interest in personal property as would be an estate of freehold if it were an estate in land, and in the same deed, will, or writing an estate is afterwards limited by way of remainder to his heirs, or the heirs of his body, or his issue, the words “heirs,” “heirs of his body,” and “issue,” or other words of like import used in the deed, will, or writing in the limitation therein by way of remainder shall not be construed as words of limitation carrying to such person the inheritance as to the land, or the absolute estate as to the personal property, but they shall be construed as words of purchase, creating a remainder in the heirs, heirs of the body, or issue.

History.

Code 1919, § 5152; Code 1950, § 55-14; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

Law Review.

For note on law revision and reform in the common-law countries, see 13 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 253 (1971).

For article, “The Future of Future Interests,” see 60 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 513 (2003).

For article, “Toward a Model Law of Estates and Future Interests,” see 66 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 3 (2009).

§ 55.1-113.
Doctrine of worthier title abolished.

The doctrine of worthier title is abolished in the Commonwealth as a rule of law and as a rule of construction.

History.

2007, c. 215, § 55-14.1; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

Law Review.

For article, “Toward a Model Law of Estates and Future Interests,” see 66 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 3 (2009).

§ 55.1-114.
When contingent remainder not to fail.

A contingent remainder shall not fail for want of a particular estate to support it.

History.

Code 1919, § 5153; Code 1950, § 55-15; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

Law Review.

For article, “The Future of Future Interests,” see 60 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 513 (2003).

For article, “Toward a Model Law of Estates and Future Interests,” see 66 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 3 (2009).

§ 55.1-115.
When remainders not defeated.

The alienation of a particular estate on which a remainder depends, or the union of such estate with the inheritance by purchase or descent, shall not operate, by merger or otherwise, to defeat, impair, or otherwise affect such remainder.

History.

Code 1919, § 5154; Code 1950, § 55-16; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-116.
In what conveyances possession transferred to the use.

By deed of bargain and sale, or by deeds of lease and release, or by covenant to stand seized to the use, or deed operating by way of covenant to stand seized to the use, the possession of the grantor shall be deemed transferred to the grantee or other person entitled to the use, for the estate or interest that such person has in the use, as perfectly as if the grantee or other person entitled to the use had been enfeoffed with livery of seisin of the land intended to be conveyed by such deed or covenant.

History.

Code 1919, § 5155; Code 1950, § 55-17; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

Law Review.

For comment on effect of statute of uses on land trusts, see 7 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 368 (1966).

For article, “The Virginia Land Trust — An Overlooked Title Holding Device for Investment, Business and Estate Planning Purposes,” see 30 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 73 (1973).

§ 55.1-117.
Land trusts not to fail because no beneficiaries are specified by name and no duties laid on trustee; when interest of beneficiaries deemed personal property; liens.

No trust relating to real estate shall fail nor shall any use relating to real estate be defeated because no beneficiaries are specified by name in the recorded deed of conveyance to the trustee or because no duties are imposed upon the trustee. The power conferred by any such instrument on a trustee to sell, lease, encumber, or otherwise dispose of property described in such instrument shall be effective, and no person dealing with such a trustee shall be required to make further inquiry as to the right of such trustee to act, nor shall he be required to inquire as to the disposition of any proceeds.

In any case under this section where there is a recorded deed of conveyance to a trustee, the interest of the beneficiaries thereunder shall be deemed to be personal property. Judgments against a beneficiary and consensual liens against real property of a beneficiary do not attach to real property that is the subject of such a deed of conveyance unless the judgment is docketed or the lien recorded in the county or city where the property is located (i) before recordation of the deed creating the land trust and (ii) while the beneficiary has record title to the real property.

In any case under this section where there is a recorded deed of conveyance to a trustee and the trustee named in the deed declines to serve, resigns, is disqualified or removed, or is adjudicated incapacitated and there is (a) no successor trustee named in the deed, (b) no successor trustee designated by the terms of the trust instrument, or (c) no procedure set forth in the deed or trust instrument to designate a successor trustee, the beneficiaries of the trust, by majority decision, shall name a successor trustee. However, if the identities of the beneficiaries of the trust cannot be identified from the recorded deed of conveyance or a majority of the beneficiaries are unable to agree upon a successor trustee, the circuit court of the county or city in which the deed was recorded, upon the motion of any party interested in the administration of the trust, shall appoint a successor trustee whenever the court considers the appointment necessary for the administration of the trust. The name and address of any successor trustee so named or appointed shall be recorded with the clerk of the circuit court of the county or city in which the deed was recorded, and such successor trustee shall succeed to all the rights, powers, and privileges, and shall be subject to all the duties, liabilities, and responsibilities imposed upon, the original trustee unless the deed of conveyance expressly provides to the contrary.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to (1) affect any right that a creditor may otherwise have against a trustee or beneficiary except as provided in this section, (2) enlarge upon the power of a corporation to act as trustee under §

6.2-1001

, or (3) affect the rule against perpetuities.

History.

1962, c. 452, § 55-17.1; 1975, c. 375; 1993, c. 454; 2011, c. 661; 2012, c. 558; 2019, c. 712.

Cross references.

As to Uniform Trust Code, see §

64.2-700

et seq.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1993, c. 454, which amended this section, in cl. 2 provides: “That this act is declaratory of existing law.”

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

Law Review.

For article, “The Virginia Land Trust — An Overlooked Title Holding Device for Investment, Business and Estate Planning Purposes,” see 30 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 73 (1973).

For article discussing due-on-sale clauses in home-purchasing contracts, see 16 U. Rich. L. Rev. 35 (1982).

For article, “Virginia’s Augmented Estate System: An Overview,” see 24 U. Rich. L. Rev. 513 (1990).

For annual survey article, “Wills, Trusts, and Estates,” see 46 U. Rich. L. Rev. 243 (2011).

For annual survey of Virginia law article, “Wills, Trusts, and Estates,” see 47 U. Rich. L. Rev. 343 (2012).

§ 55.1-118.
Deed of release effectual.

Every deed of release of any estate or interest capable of passing by deed of lease or release shall be as effectual for the purposes expressed in such deed of release, without the execution of a lease, as if the same had been executed.

History.

Code 1919, § 5156; Code 1950, § 55-18; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

5A M.J. Cotenancy, § 4.

§ 55.1-119.
When person not a party, etc., may take or sue under instrument.

An immediate estate or interest in or the benefit of a condition respecting any estate may be taken by a person under an instrument, although he is not a party to such instrument; and if a covenant or promise is made for the benefit, in whole or in part, of a person with whom it is not made, or with whom it is made jointly with others, such person, whether named in the instrument or not, may maintain in his own name any action thereon that he might maintain as though it had been made with him only and the consideration had moved from him to the party making such covenant or promise. In such action, the covenantor or promisor shall be permitted to make all defenses he may have, not only against the covenantee or promisee, but also against such beneficiary.

History.

Code 1919, § 5143; Code 1950, § 55-22; 2019, c. 712.

Cross references.

As to action for damages from legal malpractice concerning estate planning, see §

64.2-520.1

.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

Law Review.

For note, “Whose Beneficiaries are They Anyway? Copenhaver v. Rogers and the Attorney’s Contract to Prepare A Will in Virginia,” see 24 U. Rich. L. Rev. 415 (1990).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

3C M.J. Commercial Law, § 36; 4A M.J. Contracts, § 81; 5A M.J. Covenants, § 50.

§ 55.1-120.
Informalities in deeds made by attorneys-in-fact.

If, in a deed made by one as attorney-in-fact for another, the words of conveyance or the signature is in the name of the attorney, it is as much the principal’s deed as if the words of conveyance or the signature were in the name of the principal by the attorney, if it is manifest on the face of the deed that it should be construed to be that of the principal to give effect to its intent.

History.

Code 1919, § 5145; Code 1950, § 55-23; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-121.
Time for objections to irregularities in advertising sales made by trustees.

All deeds made and executed prior to January 1, 1940, by trustees conveying property sold under deeds of trust in which default was made in the debt secured and as to which irregularities in advertising such sales have occurred shall be held and the same are hereby declared valid in all respects, if otherwise valid according to law then in force, after the expiration of 15 years from the date on which such sale was made by such trustees.

History.

1924, p. 308; Michie Code 1942, § 5827b; Code 1950, § 55-24; 1952, c. 375; 1960, c. 105; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-122.
Recovery at death of life tenant of taxes paid on life estate.

When any person dies possessed of a life estate in real estate that was assessed with taxes in the name of such life tenant for the year in which such life tenant dies and such taxes are paid for that year by any person other than the remainderman entitled to such real estate, such person or his estate so paying such taxes shall be entitled to recover from such remainderman such proportionate part of the sum so paid as that part of the year following the death of the life tenant bears to the entire year, provided, however, that if upon the death of the life tenant the real estate shall come into the possession of another life tenant, such recovery shall be had from the subsequent life tenant and not from the remainderman.

History.

1932, p. 331; Michie Code 1942, § 5392a; Code 1950, § 55-25; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-123.
Removal of a cloud on title; nature of plaintiff’s title.

When a petition is filed to remove a cloud on the title to real estate, relief shall not be denied the complainant because he has only an equitable title to such real estate and is out of possession, but the court shall grant to the complainant such relief as he would be entitled to if he held the legal title and was in possession. If an issue of fact is raised which but for this section would entitle either party to a trial by jury, the court shall, upon the request of the party so entitled, order such issue to be tried by a jury.

History.

Code 1919, § 6248; Code 1950, § 55-153; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

Law Review.

For article on title examination in Virginia, see 17 U. Rich. L. Rev. 229 (1983).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

15 M.J. Quieting Title, §§ 2, 7, 8, 10, 11.